Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-161
Special party buses; buses providing charter services; distinguishing signs or other indicia.

The Public Service Commission shall, in consultation with the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for signs or other indicia distinguishing between buses providing special party services and buses providing charter services.

Laws 2020, LB734, § 11.